Utah statutes.
34-47-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Labor Commission.

(2)  "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Labor Commission.

(3)  "Council" means the Worker Classification Coordinated Enforcement Council created in Section 34-47-201.

(4)  "Member agency" means an agency that is represented on the council.

(5)  "Misclassification" means to classify an individual as something other than an employee, if under the relevant law the individual is required to be classified as an employee.

